Ohio, session 136, SB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.852 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3701.852. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Athletic facility" has the same meaning as in section 3707.50 of the Revised Code. (2) "Automated external defibrillator" has the same meaning as in section 3313.717 of the Revised Code. (B) Each athletic facility shall install and maintain an automated external defibrillator on its premises. (C) An athletic facility that fails to comply with division (B) of this section is liable in a civil action for compensatory and exemplary damages and reasonable attorney's fees to any person, or the representative of the estate of any person, who sustains injury, death, or loss to person or property as the result of the athletic facility's acts or omissions constituting a failure to comply with division (B) of this section. In any action under this division, the court also may award any injunctive or other equitable relief that the court considers appropriate.